Florida, session 2026, SB1336.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 11 12 Section 1.âSection 790.253, Florida Statutes, is created to 13 read: 14 790.253âFirearm hold agreements; immunity from liability.â 15 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 16 (a)ââFederal firearms licenseeâ means a person licensed 17 pursuant to 18 U.S.C. chapter 44. 18 (b)ââFirearm hold agreementâ means a private transaction 19 between a federal firearms licensee and an individual firearm 20 owner in which the licensee either provides locked storage in 21 his or her facility to which only the firearm owner has access 22 or takes physical possession of the ownerâs lawfully possessed 23 firearm at the ownerâs request, holds the firearm for an agreed 24 upon period of time, and returns the firearm to the owner 25 according to the terms of the transaction. 26 (2)âA federal firearms licensee is immune from civil 27 liability while operating lawfully in this state for any act or 28 omission arising from a firearm hold agreement which results in 29 the personal injury or death of any individual, including the 30 return of any firearm to the individual firearm owner by a 31 federal firearms licensee at the termination of a firearm hold 32 agreement. 33 (3)âThe immunity from civil liability under subsection (2) 34 does not apply to any action arising from a firearm hold 35 agreement if such action was the result of otherwise unlawful 36 conduct on the part of the federal firearms licensee. 37 (4)âThis section does not apply to a firearm transfer 38 pursuant to s. 790.401 or if there is a known existing 39 protection order governing the respondent under s. 741.30, s. 40 784.046, or s. 784.0485 or under any other applicable law. 41 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.